California statutes. Public Resources Code
 electronic device, as defined in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 42463, manufactured by the manufacturer. The notice shall identify the covered electronic device, as defined in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 42463, by brand and model number, and shall inform the retailer that the electronic device, as defined in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 42463, is a covered electronic device, as defined in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 42463, and is subject to a covered battery-embedded waste recycling fee in accordance with subdivision (b) of Section 42464.

(b) A manufacturer subject to this subdivision shall also send copies of the notice to CalRecycle.

(c) The notice required by this subdivision shall be sent in accordance with the following schedule:

(1) On or before July 1, 2025, and every year thereafter, the manufacturer shall send a notice covering any covered electronic device, as defined in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 42463, manufactured by that manufacturer that is subject to this chapter.

(2) On or
 before July 1, 2025, and every year thereafter, the manufacturer shall send a notice covering any product manufactured by that manufacturer that is exempt from the covered battery-embedded product definition, pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (g) of Section 42463.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 370, Sec. 18.   (SB 1215)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Sections 42485 and 42486.)
-------------------------------------------

42467.

(a) On or before July 1, 2027, and at least once annually thereafter, each manufacturer of a covered electronic device, as defined in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 42463, sold in this state shall do both of the following:

(1) Submit to CalRecycle a report that includes all of the following information:

(A) An estimate of the number of covered electronic devices, as defined in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision
 (g) of Section 42463, sold by the manufacturer in the state during the previous year.

(B) The chemistry of the battery contained within the covered electronic devices, as defined in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 42463, sold by the manufacturer.

(C) A baseline or set of baselines that show the total estimated amount of recycled materials contained in covered electronic devices, as defined in subparagraph (B)
 of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 42463, sold by the manufacturer in that year and the increase in the use of those recycled materials from the previous year.

(D) A list of those retailers, including, but not limited to, internet and catalog retailers, to which the manufacturer provided a notice in the prior 12 months pursuant to Section 42466.2.

(2) Make information available to consumers that describes where and how to return, recycle, and dispose of the covered electronic device, as defined in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 42463, and opportunities and
 locations for the collection or return of the device, through the use of a toll-free telephone number, internet website, information labeled on the device, information included in the packaging, or information accompanying the sale of the covered electronic device, as defined in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 42463.

(b) Any information submitted to CalRecycle pursuant to subdivision (a) that is proprietary in nature or a trade secret shall be subject to protection under state laws and regulations governing that information.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 370, Sec. 19.   (SB 1215)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Sections 42485 and 42486.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Administration [42472. - 42475.4.]

42472.

(a) The imposition of a covered electronic waste recycling fee is a matter of statewide interest and concern and is applicable uniformly throughout the state. A city, county, city and county, or other public agency may not adopt, implement, or enforce an ordinance, resolution, regulation, or rule requiring a consumer, manufacturer, or retailer to recycle covered electronic devices or imposing a covered electronic waste recycling fee upon a manufacturer, retailer, or consumer, unless expressly authorized under this
 chapter.

(b) Nothing in this section prohibits the adoption, implementation, or enforcement of any local ordinance, resolution, regulation, or rule governing curbside or drop off recycling programs operated by, or pursuant to a contract with, a city, county, city and county, or other public agency, including any action relating to fees for these programs. Nothing in this section shall be construed to affect any contract, franchise, permit, license, or other arrangement regarding the collection or recycling of solid waste or household hazardous waste.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 526, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2004.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Sections 42485 and 42486.)
-------------------------------------------

42473.

The Legislature declares that the imposition of a covered electronic waste recycling fee would not result in the imposition of a tax within the meaning of Article XIIIA of the California Constitution, because the amount and nature of the fee has a fair and reasonable relationship to the adverse environmental burdens imposed by the disposal of covered electronic devices and there is a sufficient nexus between the fee imposed and the use of those fees to support the recycling and reuse of these
 devices.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 526, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2004.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Sections 42485 and 42486.)
-------------------------------------------

42474.

(a) Civil liability in an amount of up to two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) per offense may be administratively imposed by CalRecycle for each sale of a covered electronic device for which a covered electronic waste recycling fee or covered battery-embedded waste recycling fee, as applicable, has not been paid pursuant to Section 42464.

(b) A civil penalty in an amount of up to five thousand dollars ($5,000) per offense may be imposed by a superior court for each sale of a covered electronic device for which a covered electronic waste recycling fee
 or covered battery-embedded waste recycling fee, as applicable, has not been paid pursuant to Section 42464.

(c) Civil liability in an amount of up to twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) may be administratively imposed by CalRecycle against manufacturers for failure to comply with this chapter, except as otherwise provided in subdivision (a).

(d) Civil liability in an amount of up to twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) per violation may be administratively imposed by CalRecycle against a person, including an authorized collector or covered electronic waste recycler, that makes a false statement or representation in any document filed, submitted, maintained, or used for purposes of compliance with this chapter and associated regulations.

(e) (1) CalRecycle may revoke the approval or deny the renewal application of an authorized collector or covered electronic waste recycler that makes a false statement or representation in a document filed, submitted, maintained, or used for purposes of compliance with this chapter and the regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter.

(2) In addition to the authority specified in paragraph (1),
 CalRecycle may deny an application for approval or renewal from an authorized collector or covered electronic waste recycler that, or an individual identified in the application who, has a history demonstrating a pattern of operation in conflict with the requirements of this chapter and the regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter.

(3) (A) A person challenging a revocation, denial of application renewal, or application denial under this chapter, or an approved covered electronic waste recycler challenging the denial or adjustment of an electronic waste recovery payment or electronic waste recycling payment, shall first exhaust all administrative remedies by filing with CalRecycle a timely administrative appeal, in accordance with the regulations adopted to implement this chapter.

(B) The hearing shall be held before the director or the director’s designee, who shall issue a written decision stating the factual and legal basis for this decision.

(f) (1) A manufacturer shall maintain and keep accessible all records required to be kept or submitted pursuant to this chapter for a minimum of three years.

(2) A manufacturer shall, upon request, provide CalRecycle with relevant records necessary to determine compliance with this chapter.

(g) All reports and records provided to CalRecycle pursuant to this chapter shall be provided under penalty of perjury.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 370, Sec. 20.   (SB 1215)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Sections 42485 and 42486.)
-------------------------------------------

42474.5.

Notwithstanding any other law, this chapter and all regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter may be enforced by DTSC pursuant to Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 25100) of Division 20 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 370, Sec. 21.   (SB 1215)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Sections 42485 and 42486.)
-------------------------------------------

42475.

(a) CalRecycle shall administer and enforce this chapter in consultation with DTSC.

(b) CalRecycle and DTSC may adopt regulations pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code that are necessary to implement this chapter, and any other regulations that CalRecycle and DTSC determines are necessary to implement the provisions of this chapter in a manner that is enforceable.

(c) CalRecycle shall adopt regulations pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code
 to protect any proprietary information submitted to CalRecycle by a manufacturer of covered electronic devices.

(d) CalRecycle and DTSC may prepare, publish, or issue any materials that CalRecycle or DTSC determines to be necessary to disseminate information concerning CalRecycle’s and DTSC’s activities under this chapter.

(e) In carrying out this chapter, CalRecycle and DTSC may solicit and use any and all expertise available in other state agencies, including, but not limited to, the Department of Conservation and CDTFA.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 370, Sec. 22.   (SB 1215)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Sections 42485 and 42486.)
-------------------------------------------

42475.2.

(a) CalRecycle and DTSC may each adopt regulations to implement and enforce this chapter as emergency regulations.

(b) The emergency regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter shall be adopted in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and for purposes of that chapter, including Section 11349.6 of the Government Code, the adoption of these regulations is an emergency and shall be considered by the Office of Administrative Law as necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, safety, and general welfare. Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing
 with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, any emergency regulations adopted by CalRecycle or DTSC pursuant to this section shall be filed with, but not be repealed by, the Office of Administrative Law and shall remain in effect for a period of two years or until revised by DTSC or CalRecycle, whichever occurs sooner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 370, Sec. 23.   (SB 1215)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Sections 42485 and 42486.)
-------------------------------------------

42475.3.

CalRecycle, in collaboration with DTSC, shall convene a covered electronic waste working group comprised of representatives from manufacturers of covered electronic devices and other interested parties to develop and, by July 1, 2005, advise CalRecycle and the State and Consumer Services Agency on environmental purchasing criteria that may be used by state agencies to identify covered electronic devices with reduced environmental impacts. In defining criteria, the group shall consider the environmental impacts of products over their entire life cycle, as well as tradeoffs in other product attributes such as safety, product functionality, and cost. The group shall also consider any federal product evaluation or rating system, or
 market based system to promote the development and sale of environmentally conscious products.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 370, Sec. 24.   (SB 1215)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Sections 42485 and 42486.)
-------------------------------------------

42475.4.

(a) CalRecycle shall annually establish, and update as necessary, statewide recycling goals for covered electronic waste. In implementing this section, CalRecycle shall do all of the following:

(1) Post on its internet website information on the amount of covered electronic devices sold in the state in the previous year as reported to CalRecycle.

(2) Post on its internet website information on the amount of covered electronic waste recycled in the state in the previous year as reported to CalRecycle.

(3) Develop and
 adopt recycling goals, with input from manufacturers, retailers, covered electronic waste recyclers, and collectors, that reflect projections of covered electronic device sales, rates of obsolescence, and stockpiles.

(b) Nothing in this section authorizes CalRecycle to establish any recycling rates or dates by which a manufacturer of covered electronic devices shall comply with this chapter, or to impose any other recycling goal or target on a manufacturer of those devices.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 370, Sec. 25.   (SB 1215)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Sections 42485 and 42486.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Financial Provisions [42476. - 42479.]

42476.

(a) (1) The Electronic Waste Recovery and Recycling Account is hereby established in the Integrated Waste Management Fund. All covered electronic waste recycling fees collected from sales of covered electronic devices, as defined in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 42463, shall be deposited into the Electronic Waste Recovery and Recycling Account.

(2) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the funds in the
 Electronic Waste Recovery and Recycling Account are hereby continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal year, for the following purposes:

(A) To pay refunds of the covered electronic waste recycling fee imposed under Section 42464.

(B) To make electronic waste recovery payments to an authorized collector of covered electronic waste, resulting from discarded covered electronic devices, as defined in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 42463, pursuant to Section 42479.

(C) To make electronic waste recycling payments to covered electronic waste recyclers, for recycling covered electronic waste resulting from discarded covered electronic devices, as defined in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 42463, pursuant to
 Section 42479.

(D) To make payments to manufacturers for covered electronic waste, resulting from discarded covered electronic devices, as defined in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 42463, pursuant to subdivision (i).

(b) (1) The Covered Battery-Embedded Waste Recycling Fee Subaccount is hereby created in the Electronic Waste Recovery and Recycling Account. All covered battery-embedded waste recycling fees collected from sales of covered electronic devices, as defined in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 42463, shall be
 deposited into the Covered Battery-Embedded Waste Recycling Fee Subaccount.

(2) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the funds in the Covered Battery-Embedded Waste Recycling Fee Subaccount are hereby continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal year, for the following purposes:

(A) To pay refunds of the covered battery-embedded waste recycling fee imposed under Section 42464.

(B) To make electronic waste recovery payments to an authorized collector of covered electronic waste resulting from discarded covered electronic devices, as defined in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 42463, pursuant to Section 42479.

(C) To make electronic waste recycling payments to covered
 electronic waste recyclers for recycling covered electronic waste resulting from discarded covered electronic devices, as defined in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 42463, pursuant to Section 42479.

(D) To make payments to manufacturers for covered electronic waste resulting from discarded covered electronic devices, as defined in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 42463, pursuant to subdivision (i).

(c) (1) The money in the
 Electronic Waste Recovery and Recycling Account may be expended for the following purposes only upon appropriation by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act:

(A) For the administration of this chapter by CalRecycle and DTSC, as related to covered electronic devices, as defined in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 42463, and covered electronic waste resulting from discarded covered electronic devices, as defined in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 42463.

(B) To reimburse CDTFA for its administrative costs of registering, collecting, making refunds, and auditing retailers and consumers in connection with the covered electronic waste recycling fee imposed under Section 42464.

(C) To provide funding to DTSC to
 implement and enforce Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 25100) of Division 20 of the Health and Safety Code, as related to covered electronic devices, as defined in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 42463, as and as related to covered electronic waste, resulting from discarded covered electronic devices, defined in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 42463, including any regulations adopted by DTSC pursuant to that chapter, as that chapter relates to covered electronic devices, as defined in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 42463, and as related to covered electronic waste, resulting from discarded covered electronic devices, defined in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 42463.

(D) To establish the public information program specified in subdivision
 (e), as it relates to covered electronic devices, as defined in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 42463, and as related to covered electronic waste, resulting from discarded covered electronic devices, defined in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 42463.

(E) For expenditure pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of, and paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of, Section 17001.

(2) The money in the Covered Battery-Embedded Waste Recycling Fee Subaccount may be expended solely for the following purposes only upon appropriation by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act:

(A) For the administration of this chapter by CalRecycle and DTSC, as related to covered electronic devices, as defined in subparagraph (B) of
 paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 42463 and covered electronic waste resulting from discarded covered electronic devices, as defined in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 42463.

(B) To reimburse CDTFA for its administrative costs of registering, collecting, making refunds, and auditing retailers and consumers in connection with the covered battery-embedded waste recycling fee imposed under Section 42464.

(C) To provide funding to DTSC to implement and enforce Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 25100) of Division 20 of the Health and Safety Code, as it relates to covered electronic devices, as defined in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 42463, and as it relates to covered electronic waste resulting from discarded covered electronic devices, defined in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of
 Section 42463, including any regulations adopted by DTSC pursuant to that chapter, as that chapter relates to covered electronic devices, as defined in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 42463 and covered electronic waste resulting from discarded covered electronic devices, as defined in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 42463.

(D) To establish the public information program specified in subdivision (e), as it relates to covered electronic devices, as defined in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 42463, and as it relates to covered electronic waste resulting from covered electronic devices, as defined in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of
 Section 42463.

(3) Any fines or penalties collected pursuant to this chapter shall be deposited in the Electronic Waste Penalty Subaccount, which is hereby established in the account. The funds in the Electronic Waste Penalty Subaccount may be expended by CalRecycle or DTSC only upon appropriation by the Legislature.

(d) Notwithstanding Section 16475 of the Government Code, any interest earned upon funds in the Electronic Waste Recovery and Recycling Account shall be deposited in that account for expenditure pursuant to this chapter.

(e) Not more than 2 percent of the funds annually deposited in the
 Electronic Waste Recovery and Recycling Account and not more than 2 percent of the funds annually deposited in the Covered Battery-Embedded Waste Recycling Fee Subaccount shall be expended for purposes of establishing the public information program to educate the public in the hazards of improper covered electronic device storage and disposal and on the opportunities to recycle covered electronic devices.

(f) CalRecycle shall adopt regulations specifying cancellation methods for the recovery, processing, or recycling of covered electronic waste.

(g) CalRecycle may pay an electronic waste recycling payment or electronic waste recovery payment only for covered electronic waste that meets all of the following conditions:

(1) (A) The covered electronic waste is demonstrated to have been generated by a person who used the covered electronic device while located in this state.

(B) Covered electronic waste generated outside of the state and subsequently brought into the state is not eligible for payment.

(C) CalRecycle shall establish documentation requirements for purposes of this paragraph that are necessary to demonstrate that the covered electronic waste was generated in
 the state and eligible for payment.

(2) The covered electronic waste, including any residuals from the processing of the waste, is handled in compliance with all applicable statutes and regulations.

(3) The manufacturer or the authorized collector or recycler of the electronic waste provides a cost-free and convenient opportunity to recycle electronic waste, in accordance with the legislative intent specified in subdivision (b) of Section 42461.

(4) If the covered electronic waste is processed, the covered electronic waste is processed in this state according to the cancellation method authorized by CalRecycle.

(h) The Legislature hereby declares that the state is a market participant in the business of the recycling of covered electronic waste for all of the following reasons:

(1) The covered electronic waste recycling fee or the covered battery-embedded waste recycling fee, as applicable, are collected from the state’s consumers for covered electronic devices sold for use in the state.

(2) The purpose of the covered electronic waste recycling fee and the covered battery-embedded waste recycling fee and subsequent payments is to prevent damage to the public health and the environment from waste generated in the state.

(3) The recycling system funded by the
 covered electronic waste recycling fee and the covered battery-embedded waste recycling fee ensures that economically viable and sustainable markets are developed and supported for recovered materials and components in order to conserve resources and maximize business and employment opportunities within the state.

(i) (1) CalRecycle may make a payment to a manufacturer that takes back a covered electronic device from a consumer in this state for purposes of recycling the device at a processing facility. The amount of the payment made by CalRecycle shall equal the value of the covered electronic waste recycling fee or the covered battery-embedded
 waste recycling fee, as applicable, paid for that device. To qualify for a payment pursuant to this subdivision, the manufacturer shall demonstrate both of the following to CalRecycle:

(A) The covered electronic device for which payment is claimed was used in this state.

(B) The covered electronic waste for which a payment is claimed, including any residuals from the processing of the waste, has been, and will be, handled in compliance with all applicable statutes and regulations.

(2) A covered electronic device for which a payment is made under this subdivision is not eligible for an electronic waste recovery payment or an electronic waste recycling payment under Section 42479.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 72, Sec. 45.   (SB 156)   Effective July 2, 2024.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Sections 42485 and 42486.)
-------------------------------------------

42476.5.

A person who exports covered electronic waste, or a covered electronic device intended for recycling or disposal, to a foreign country, or to another state for ultimate export to a foreign country, shall do all of the following at least 60 days prior to export:

(a) Notify DTSC of the destination, disposition, contents, and volume of the waste or device intended for recycling or disposal to be exported, and include with the notification the demonstrations required pursuant to subdivisions (b) to (f), inclusive.

(b) Demonstrate that the waste or device is being exported for purposes of recycling or disposal.

(c) Demonstrate that the importation of the waste or device is not prohibited by an applicable law in the state or country of destination and that any import will be conducted in accordance with all applicable laws. As part of this demonstration, required import and operating licenses, permits, or other appropriate authorization documents shall be forwarded to DTSC.

(d) Demonstrate that the exportation of the waste or device is conducted in accordance with applicable United States or applicable international law.

(e) (1) Demonstrate that the waste or device will be managed within the country of destination only at facilities whose operations meet or exceed the binding decisions and implementing guidelines of the Organization for Economic Cooperation
 and Development for the environmentally sound management of the waste or device being exported.

(2) The demonstration required by this subdivision applies to any country of destination, notwithstanding that the country is not a member of the Organization for Economic Cooperation and Development.

(f) Demonstrate that the person attempted to locate an in-state covered electronic waste recycler and that the waste or device could not be managed by an in-state covered electronic waste recycler.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 308, Sec. 1.   (SB 568)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Sections 42485 and 42486.)
-------------------------------------------

42476.6.

Section 42476.5 does not apply to a component part of a covered electronic device that is exported to an authorized collector or recycler and that is reused or recycled into a new electronic component.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 526, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2004.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Sections 42485 and 42486.)
-------------------------------------------

42477.

(a) On July 1, 2004, or as specified otherwise in Section 25214.10.1 of the Health and Safety Code, and on July 1 of each year thereafter, CalRecycle, in collaboration with DTSC, shall establish an electronic waste recovery payment schedule for covered electronic wastes generated in this state to cover the average net cost for an authorized collector to operate a free and convenient system for collecting, consolidating and transporting covered electronic wastes generated in this state.

(b) CalRecycle shall make the electronic waste recovery payments either directly to an authorized collector or to a covered electronic waste recycler for payment to
 an authorized collector pursuant to this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 370, Sec. 28.   (SB 1215)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Sections 42485 and 42486.)
-------------------------------------------

42478.

(a) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), on July 1, 2004, or as specified otherwise in Section 25214.10.1 of the Health and Safety Code, and on July 1 of each year thereafter, CalRecycle, in collaboration with DTSC, shall establish a covered electronic waste recycling payment schedule for covered electronic wastes generated in this state from discarded covered electronic devices, as defined in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 42463, to cover the average net cost for
 an electronic waste recycler to receive, process, and recycle each major category, as determined by CalRecycle, of covered electronic waste, resulting from discarded covered electronic devices, as defined in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 42463, received from an authorized collector. CalRecycle shall make the electronic waste recycling payments to a covered electronic waste recycler pursuant to this article.

(2) Until CalRecycle adopts a new payment schedule that covers the average net cost for an electronic waste recycler to receive, process, and recycle each major category, as determined by CalRecycle of covered electronic
 waste, resulting from discarded covered electronic devices, as defined in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 42463, received from an authorized collector, the amount of the covered electronic waste recycling payment shall be equal to twenty-eight cents ($0.28) per pound of the total weight of covered electronic waste, resulting from discarded covered electronic devices, as defined in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 42463, received from an authorized collector and subsequently processed for recycling.

(b) (1) CalRecycle
 shall adopt regulations, effective January 1, 2025, to establish a process for covered electronic waste recyclers to submit payment claims for covered electronic waste resulting from discarded covered electronic devices, as defined in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 42463.

(2) On April 1, 2026, CalRecycle shall begin accepting payment claims for covered electronic waste, resulting from
 discarded covered electronic devices, as defined in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 42463, collected on or after January 1, 2026.

(c) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), on July 1, 2028, and on July 1 every year thereafter, CalRecycle, in collaboration with DTSC, shall establish a covered electronic waste recycling payment schedule for covered electronic waste generated in this state, resulting from discarded covered electronic devices, as defined in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 42463, to cover the average net cost for
 an electronic waste recycler to receive, process, and recycle each major category, as determined by CalRecycle, of covered electronic waste, resulting from discarded covered electronic devices, as defined in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 42463, received from an authorized collector. CalRecycle shall make the electronic waste recycling payments to a covered electronic waste recycler pursuant to this article.

(2) Until CalRecycle adopts a new payment schedule that covers the average net cost for an electronic waste recycler to receive, process, and recycle each major category, as determined by CalRecycle, of covered electronic waste,
 resulting from discarded covered electronic devices, as defined in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 42463, received from an authorized collector, the amount of the covered electronic waste recycling payment shall be equal to $0.75 per pound of the total weight of covered electronic waste, resulting from discarded covered electronic devices, as defined in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 42463, received from an authorized collector and subsequently processed for recycling.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 370, Sec. 29.   (SB 1215)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Sections 42485 and 42486.)
-------------------------------------------

42479.

(a) (1) For covered electronic waste, resulting from discarded covered electronic devices, as defined in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 42463, collected for recycling on and after January 1, 2005, and for covered electronic waste, resulting from discarded covered electronic devices, as defined in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 42463, collected for recycling on or after January 1, 2026, CalRecycle shall make electronic waste recovery payments and electronic waste recycling payments for the collection and recycling of covered e-waste to an authorized collector or covered e-waste recycler, respectively, upon completion of the review by CalRecycle of a payment claim submitted to CalRecycle by the authorized collector or e-waste recycler in the
 form and manner determined by CalRecycle. CalRecycle may examine a payment claim for a period of not more than 90 days from the date of receipt of the payment claim to validate the claim’s completeness, accuracy, truthfulness, and compliance with applicable laws and regulations. All of the following shall be considered official records for purposes of Section 1280 of the Evidence Code:

(A) The results of a payment claim review or subsequent payment claim audit.

(B) Written information compiled by CalRecycle during a claim review or subsequent claim audit.

(2) To the extent authorized by Section 42477, a covered e-waste recycler shall make the electronic waste recovery payments to an authorized collector upon receipt of a completed and verified invoice submitted to the recycler by the authorized collector in the form
 and manner determined by CalRecycle.

(b) A covered e-waste recycler is eligible for a payment pursuant to this section only if the covered e-waste recycler meets all of the following requirements:

(1) The covered e-waste recycler is in compliance with applicable requirements of Article 7 (commencing with Section 66273.70) of Chapter 23 of Division 4.5 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.

(2) The covered e-waste recycler demonstrates to CalRecycle that a facility utilized by the covered e-waste recycler for the handling, processing, refurbishment, or recycling of covered electronic devices meets all of the following standards:

(A) The facility has been inspected by DTSC within the past 12 months and had been found to be operating in
 conformance with all applicable laws, regulations, and ordinances.

(B) The facility is accessible during normal business hours for unannounced inspections by state or local agencies.

(C) The facility has health and safety, employee training, and environmental compliance plans and certifies compliance with the plans.

(D) The facility meets or exceeds the standards specified in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1171) of Part 4 of Division 2 of, Division 4 (commencing with Section 3200) of, and Division 5 (commencing with Section 6300) of, the Labor Code or, if all or part of the work is to be performed in another state, the equivalent requirements of that state.

(c) CalRecycle may conduct a selective audit of authorized collectors, covered e-waste
 recyclers, or manufacturers receiving payments from CalRecycle to determine whether electronic waste recovery payments, electronic waste recycling payments, or payments to manufacturers are being paid by CalRecycle according to the requirements of this chapter and the regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter. CalRecycle collect and recover from authorized collectors, covered e-waste recyclers, or manufacturers, with interest, any moneys improperly paid.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 131, Sec. 200.   (AB 1754)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Sections 42485 and 42486.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. State Agency Procurement [42480. - 42480.]

42480.

(a) (1) A state agency that purchases or leases covered electronic devices shall require each prospective bidder, to certify that it, and its agents, subsidiaries, partners, joint venturers, and subcontractors for the procurement, have complied with this chapter and any regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter, or to demonstrate that this chapter is inapplicable to all lines of business engaged in by the bidder, its agents, subsidiaries, partners, joint venturers, or subcontractors.

(2) The certification requirement set forth in paragraph (1) does not apply to a credit card purchase of goods of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) or less. The total amount of exemption authorized herein shall not exceed seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500) per year for each company from which a state agency is purchasing goods by credit card. It shall be the responsibility of each state agency to monitor the use of this exemption and adhere to these restrictions on these purchases.

(b) Failure to provide certification pursuant to this section shall render the prospective bidder and its agents, subsidiaries, partners, joint venturers, and subcontractors ineligible to bid on the procurement of covered electronic devices.

(c) The bid solicitation documents shall specify that the prospective bidder is
 required to cooperate fully in providing reasonable access to its records and documents that evidence compliance with this chapter.

(d) Any person awarded a contract by a state agency that is found to be in violation of this section is subject to the following sanctions:

(1) The contract shall be voided by the state agency to which the equipment, materials, or supplies were provided.

(2) The contractor is ineligible to bid on any state contract for a period of three years.
